DI-120 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DIEXX-01

DTC C 1336/ 39 Zero Point Calibration of Deceleration
Sensor Undone

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

When any of following 1. through 2. is detected:

1. In TEST mode, the shift lever is shifted to other then P
range with 2 sec. after ECU terminal IG1 is turned ON
for the first time.

2. When the deceleration sensor zero point recorded in
ECU is deleted.

* Deceleration sensor
* Deceleration sensor circuit
« Neutral start switch circuit (Rrange)

C1236/39
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-121
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkwhether zero point calibration of deceleration sensor has been done or
not.

PREPARATION:
Shiftthe shiftleverin P range and turnthe ignition switch ON, repeat connecting and releasing Tsand E
terminals of check connector 4 times or more for 8 sec. After that do not move the vehicle for 15 sec. or more.

CHECK:
YES> No problem.

VSC TRC warning light remains on.
2 [ Carry out deceleration sensor zero point calibration and confirm it by VSC TRC

OK:

VSC TRC warning light blinks

warning light.
OK> No problem.

@

3 | Check DTC for the VSC (See page DI-4).

T
*2: OtherthanDTC C1336/39is output.
* :DTCC1336/39onlyisoutput.

1
* Repair ABS control system according tothe
code output.

L

4 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between neutral start
switch (P range) and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and engine and ECT ECU (See
page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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DI-122 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

5 [ Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between deceleration
sensor and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

6 | Check deceleration sensor (See pageDI-4).

NG> Replace deceleration sensor.

@

Cgeck and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.
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